District of Columbia statutes.
47-2840

Repealed

Fortune-telling

Repealed.

July 1, 1902, 32 Stat. 628, ch. 1352, § 7, par. 43
July 1, 1932, 47 Stat. 562, ch. 366
Sept. 14, 1976, D.C. Law 1-82, title I,§ 104(z), 23 DCR 2461
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 2003(pp)(36), 46 DCR 3142
1981 Ed., § 47-2840.
1973 Ed., § 47-2342.
Office of Major and Superintendent of Metropolitan Police abolished: The Office of the Major and Superintendent of Metropolitan Police was abolished and all functions of that office transferred to and vested in the Chief of Police. The Assistant Superintendent, Executive Officer of the Metropolitan Police Department was designated “Deputy Chief of Police, Executive Officer”; the Assistant Superintendent of the Metropolitan Police in command of the Detective Bureau was designated “Deputy Chief of Police, Chief of Detectives”; and each other Assistant Superintendent of the Metropolitan Police was designated “Deputy Chief of Police” by Reorganization Order No. 7, dated September 16, 1952. Reorganization Order No. 7 was replaced by Organization Order No. 153, dated November 10, 1966.